Washington statutes.
RCW 43.85.190

Investment deposits and rate of interest.

It is the purpose of RCW 43.85.190 through 43.85.230 to authorize the state treasurer to make investment deposits of state moneys or funds in his or her custody in qualified public depositaries at a rate of interest permitted by any applicable statute or regulation.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5163; 1983 c 66 s 17; 1983 c 3 s 113; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 21; 1965 c 8 s 43.85.190. Prior: 1955 c 198 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 66: See note following RCW 39.58.010.

Construction—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 193: See notes following RCW 39.58.010.